North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-20.3 Anhydrous Ammonia Risk Management [Repealed]

19-20.3-01.
Risk management program — Anhydrous ammonia. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 168, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.3-02.
Risk management program — Enforcement authority. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 2011, ch. 168, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.